District of Columbia statutes.
6-341.02

Lease or sale by Agency authorized.

The Agency is hereby authorized in accordance with subchapter I of this chapter to lease or sell, as an entirety or parts thereof separately, to 1 or more redevelopment companies or other lessees or purchasers, such real property as may be transferred to the Agency under the authority of this subchapter.

Nov. 2, 1965, 79 Stat. 1184, Pub. L. 89-317, § 2
1981 Ed., § 5-837.
1973 Ed., § 5-734.